Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 14 Junkyard Control Act

24-14-1.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Junkyard Control Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-2.
Declaration of policy.

For the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, welfare, convenience, and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment in public highways, and to preserve and enhance the scenic beauty of lands bordering public highways, it is hereby declared to be in the public interest to regulate and restrict the establishment, operation, and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highways systems within this state. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that junkyards which do not conform to the requirements of this chapter are public nuisances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-3.
Definitions.

“Automobile junkyard” means any establishment or place where one or more unserviceable, discarded, worn out or junked automobiles or bodies, engines, tires, parts or accessories are gathered together.

“Interstate system” means that portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the director of transportation, and approved by the secretary of commerce, pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, Highways.

“Junk” means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or junked, dismantled, or wrecked automobiles, or parts thereof, iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material.

“Junkyard” means an establishment or place of business which is maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk, or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile junkyard and the term shall include garbage dumps and sanitary fills.

“Primary system” means that portion of connected main highways, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the director of transportation, and approved by the secretary of commerce, pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, Highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-4.
Junkyards prohibited.

No person, firm, corporation or association shall establish, operate or maintain a junkyard, any portion of which is within one thousand feet (1000´) of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any interstate or primary highway, except the following:

Those which are screened by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the system, or otherwise removed from sight.

Those located within areas which are zoned for industrial use under authority of law.

Those located within unzoned industrial areas, which areas shall be determined from actual land uses and defined by regulations to be promulgated by the director of transportation.

Those which are not visible from the main traveled way of the system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-5.
Junkyards lawfully in existence.

Any junkyard lawfully in existence on May 6, 1966, or which is or may be lawfully established along any highway which is hereafter made a part of the interstate or primary systems and which has been so established before the inclusion of the highway within the interstate or primary systems and which is within one thousand feet (1000´) of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of any highway on the interstate or primary system, shall be screened, if feasible, by the director of transportation at locations on the highway right-of-way or in areas acquired for such purposes outside the right-of-way so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the highways; provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall be construed to relieve the owners or operators of automobile junkyards from the provisions of chapter 21 of title 5 relating to the screening thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-6.
Requirement as to screening.

The director of transportation shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the location, planting, construction, and maintenance, including the materials used in screening or fencing required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-7.
Authority to acquire interest in land for removal and screening of junkyards.

When the director of transportation determines that the topography of the land adjoining the highway will not permit adequate screening of the junkyards or the screening of the junkyards would not be economically feasible, the director of transportation shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase, or condemnation, such interests in lands as may be necessary to secure the relocation, removal, or disposal of the junkyards; and to pay for the costs of relocation, removal, or disposal, thereof. When the director of transportation determines that it is in the best interest of the state, the director may acquire such lands, or interests in lands, as may be necessary to provide adequate screening of the junkyards by gift, purchase or condemnation. The acquisition of lands or interests in lands under this section shall be made in accordance with the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 72; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 156.

24-14-8.
Injunction.

The director of transportation may make application to the superior court in the county in which junkyards established or maintained in violation of this chapter may be located, for an injunction to abate the nuisances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-9.
Penalties.

It shall be a misdemeanor to operate or maintain a junkyard in violation of this chapter except those junkyards lawfully in existence on May 6, 1966.

It shall be the duty of the state police and the police of the cities and towns to enforce this chapter, and any persons, firm, corporation or association violating this section shall, upon conviction of the first offense, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or both the fine and imprisonment, and shall for a second or subsequent conviction be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both the fine and imprisonment; provided, however, that any automobile junkyard violating this section and chapter 21 of title 5, shall be prosecuted in accordance with chapter 21 of title 5, and upon conviction be subject to the penalties provided in that chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-10.
Interpretation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate or affect the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution, which is more restrictive than the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-11.
Agreements with the United States authorized.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with the United States secretary of commerce as provided by title 23, United States Code, relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems, and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1.

24-14-12.
Severability.

If any section, clause or provision of this chapter shall be held either unconstitutional or ineffective in whole or in part to the extent that it is not unconstitutional or ineffective, it shall be valid and effective and no other section, clause or provision shall on account of the invalidity be termed invalid or ineffective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 156.